Hawaii statutes.
[§329C-2] Offenses. (a) No person
shall manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to distribute, an
imitation controlled substance. Any person who violates this subsection shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) No person eighteen years of age or over
shall violate subsection (a) by distributing an imitation controlled substance
to a person under eighteen years of age. Any person who violates this
subsection shall be guilty of a class C felony.

(c) No person shall use, or possess with
intent to use, an imitation controlled substance. Any person who violates this
subsection shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor, except that possession of a
substance imitating a controlled substance which is subject to section 712-1249
shall constitute a violation.

(d) No person shall place in any newspaper,
magazine, handbill, or other publication, or post or distribute in any public
place, any advertisement or solicitation with reasonable knowledge that the
purpose of the advertisement or solicitation is to promote the distribution of
imitation controlled substances. Any person who violates this subsection shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) No civil or criminal liability shall be
imposed by virtue of this chapter on any person registered under chapter 329
who manufactures, distributes, or possesses an imitation controlled substance
for use as a placebo by a registered practitioner in the course of professional
practice or research. [L 1984, c 222, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next